Utah statutes.
59-12-508.   Purchaser relief from liability.
(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), a purchaser is relieved from
a penalty under Section 59-1-401 for failure to pay a tax due under this part
or an underpayment if:
(i)  the purchaser's seller or certified service provider relies on incorrect
data provided by the commission:
(A)  on a tax rate;
(B)  on a boundary;
(C)  on a taxing jurisdiction; or
(D)  in the taxability matrix the commission provides in accordance with the
agreement; or
(ii)  the purchaser, regardless of whether the purchaser holds a direct
payment permit in accordance with Section 59-12-107.1, relies on incorrect
data provided by the commission:
(A)  on a tax rate;
(B)  on a boundary;
(C)  on a taxing jurisdiction; or
(D)  in the taxability matrix the commission provides in accordance with the
agreement.
(b)  For purposes of Subsection (1)(a), a purchaser is not relieved from a
penalty under Section 59-1-401 for failure to pay a tax due under this part or
an underpayment if the purchaser's, the purchaser's seller's, or the
purchaser's certified service provider's reliance on incorrect data provided
by the commission is as a result of conduct that is:
(i)  fraudulent;
(ii)  intentional; or
(iii)  willful.
(2)  In addition to the relief from a penalty described in Subsection (1), a
purchaser is not liable for a tax or interest under Section 59-1-402 for
failure to pay a tax due under this part or an underpayment if:
(a)  the purchaser's seller or certified service provider relies on:
(i)  incorrect data provided by the commission:
(A)  on a tax rate;
(B)  on a boundary; or
(C)  on a taxing jurisdiction; or
(ii)  an erroneous classification by the commission:
(A)  in the taxability matrix the commission provides in accordance with the
agreement; and
(B)  with respect to a term:
(I)  in the library of definitions; and
(II)  that is:
(Aa)  listed as taxable or exempt;
(Bb)  included in or excluded from "sales price"; or
(Cc)  included in or excluded from a definition; or
(b)  the purchaser, regardless of whether the purchaser holds a direct payment
permit in accordance with Section 59-12-107.1, relies on:
(i)  incorrect data provided by the commission:
(A)  on a tax rate;
(B)  on a boundary; or
(C)  on a taxing jurisdiction; or
(ii)  an erroneous classification by the commission:
(A)  in the taxability matrix the commission provides in accordance with the
agreement; and
(B)  with respect to a term:
(I)  in the library of definitions; and
(II)  that is:
(Aa)  listed as taxable or exempt;
(Bb)  included in or excluded from "sales price"; or
(Cc)  included in or excluded from a definition.
